Utah statutes.
62A-11-326.3.   Determination of parental liability.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the office may determine by order the amount of a parent's liability for uninsured medical, hospital, and dental expenses of a dependent child, when the parent:

(a)  is required by a prior court or administrative order to:

(i)  share those expenses with the other parent of the dependent child; or

(ii)  obtain medical, hospital, or dental care insurance but fails to do so; or

(b)  receives direct payment from an insurer under insurance coverage obtained after the prior court or administrative order was issued.

(2)  If the prior court or administrative order does not specify what proportions of the expenses are to be shared, the office may determine the amount of liability in accordance with established rules.

(3)  This section applies to an order without regard to when it was issued.

